Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-1703
Alternative technical concept, defined.

Alternative technical concept means changes suggested by a qualified, eligible, short-listed design-builder to the commission's basic configurations, project scope, design, or construction criteria.

Laws 2018, LB775, § 4.